Yamls-norm/N-kanj_gt-norm.yaml
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: каняным
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: каняныд
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: каняныс
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: каням
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: каняд
     кань+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: каняс
     кань+N+Sg+Ine: каньын
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: каняным
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: каняныд
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: каняныс
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: каням
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: каняд
     кань+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: каняс
     кань+N+Sg+Ins: каньӧн
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: каньнаным
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: каньнаныд
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: каньнаныс
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: каньнам
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: каньнад
     кань+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: каньнас
     кань+N+Sg+Nom: кань
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: каньным
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: каньныд
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: каньныс
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: каньӧй
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: каньыд
     кань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: каньыс
     кань+N+Sg+Prl: каньӧд
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [каньнымӧд, каньӧдным]
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: каньӧдныд
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: каньӧдныс
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: каньӧдым
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: каньӧдыд
     кань+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: каньӧдыс
     кань+N+Sg+Ter: каньӧдз
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: каньӧдзным
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: каньӧдзныд
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: каньӧдзныс
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: каньӧдзым
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: каньӧдзыд
     кань+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: каньӧдзыс
     кань+N+Sg+Tra: каньті
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl1: каньтіным
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl2: каньтіныд
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl3: каньтіныс
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: каньтіым
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: каньтіыд
     кань+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: каньтіыс
